Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1286.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3714(b) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTIONS 1532(B)(1) AND 3714(B) OF TITLE 75 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 1532. SUSPENSION OF OPERATING PRIVILEGE.* * *(B) SUSPENSION.--(1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUSPEND THE OPERATING PRIVILEGE OF ANY DRIVER FOR SIX MONTHS UPON RECEIVING A CERTIFIED RECORD OF THE DRIVER'S CONVICTION OF OR AN ADJUDICATION OF <--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 DELINQUENCY BASED ON ANY OFFENSE UNDER THE FOLLOWING PROVISIONS:SECTION 3367 (RELATING TO RACING ON HIGHWAYS AND TRAFFICWAYS).[SECTION 3714(B) (RELATING TO CARELESS DRIVING).]SECTION 3734 (RELATING TO DRIVING WITHOUT LIGHTS TO AVOID IDENTIFICATION OR ARREST).SECTION 3736 (RELATING TO RECKLESS DRIVING).SECTION 3743 (RELATING TO ACCIDENTS INVOLVING DAMAGE TO ATTENDED VEHICLE OR PROPERTY).* * *§ 3714. Careless driving.* * *(b) Unintentional death.--If the person who violates this section unintentionally causes the death of another person as a result of the violation, the person [shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $500.] violating this section commits a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to a fine of up to $2,500 and a suspension of the person's operating privilege for up to two years UPON RECEIVING A CERTIFIED RECORD OF THE DRIVER'S CONVICTION OR AN ADJUDICATION OF DELINQUENCY . * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1286PN1681 - 2 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223